Hawaii statutes.
[§658B-4] Determining the money of the
claim. (a) Except as provided by subsection (b), the proper money of the
claim is, as in each case may be appropriate, the money:

(1) Regularly used between the parties as a matter of
usage or course of dealing; or

(2) Used at the time of a transaction in
international trade, by trade usage or common practice, for valuing or settling
transactions in the particular commodity or service involved; or

(3) In which the loss was ultimately felt or will be
incurred by a party.

(b) The money in which the parties have
contracted that a payment be made is the proper money of the claim for that
payment. [L 1990, c 50, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next